Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska
88-545.01
Commission;
contracts for audit or examination work authorized; Grain Warehouse Auditing
Fund; created; use; investment.

(1) The commission
may enter into contracts with public or private entities which provide a benefit
for both parties for purposes of performing audit or examination work. The
commission shall conduct the work as time permits and shall not allow the
work to conflict with the commission's primary responsibility of performing
grain warehouse examinations within the prescribed statutory time.

(2) Fees from audit or examination contracts shall be remitted
by the commission to the State Treasurer for credit to the Grain Warehouse
Auditing Fund which is created. The fund shall be available to the commission
to buy material and equipment for performing audits and examinations or to
offset the cost of performing audits and examinations. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund
at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Grain Warehouse Auditing Fund available for
investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1996, LB 1123, § 7;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 99.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.